Mississippi, session 2026, SB2315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-1-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-35.  (1)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article which shall, among other features, include a driver's license number assigned by the Department of Public Safety.  A licensee shall list his social security number with the department which shall cross reference the social security number with the driver's license number for purposes of identification.  Additionally, each license shall bear a full-face color photograph of the licensee in such form that the license and the photograph cannot be separated.  The photograph shall be taken so that one (1) exposure will photograph the applicant and the application simultaneously on the same film.  The department shall use a process in the issuance of a license with a color photograph that shall prevent as nearly as possible any alteration, counterfeiting, duplication, reproduction, forging or modification of the license or the superimposition of a photograph without ready detection.  The photograph shall be replaced by the department at the time of renewal. Drivers' licenses, including photographs appearing thereon, may be renewed by electronic means according to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner in conformity to Section 27-104-33. (2)  The commissioner shall prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article to licensees who are not United States citizens and who do not possess a social security number issued by the United States government.  The license of such persons shall include a number and/or other identifying features. (3)  Any new, renewal or duplicate driver's license, temporary driving permit or commercial driver's license issued to a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 45-33-25 shall bear a designation identifying the licensee or permittee as a sex offender. (4)  The commissioner is authorized to provide the new, renewal or duplicate driver's license, temporary driving permit or commercial driver's license to any honorably discharged veteran as defined in Title 38 of the United States Code, and such license or permit shall exhibit the letters "Vet" or any other mark identifying the person as a veteran.  The veteran requesting the "Vet" designation shall present his DD-214, Military Retiree Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Identification Card or National Guard Form NGB 22.  The veteran requesting the "Vet" designation may present his DD-214, Military Retiree Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Identification Card or National Guard Form NGB 22 in person at the Mississippi Department of Public Safety Driver's License Station. (5)  (a)  Not later than July 1, 2021, the commissioner shall develop and implement a driver's license or driving permit in electronic format as an additional option for license or permit holders.  Acceptable electronic formats include display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of electronic device. (b)  Not later than July 1, 2026, the commissioner shall ensure that the driver's license or driving permit in electronic format may be provisioned to commercially available digital wallets which the commissioner determines to be secure applications.  For the purposes of this subsection, the term "commercially available digital wallet" includes, but is not limited to, digital wallets which are pre-installed by the manufacturer of a cellular phone. (6)  If false documents are provided by an individual for purposes of obtaining a veteran driver's license, such action shall be considered fraudulent use of identity under Section 97-19-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be punishable, upon conviction, as a felony pursuant to the provisions of that section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.